Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-412
Limitation on actions and claims;
liability; benefit enforcement proceeding; when authorized.

(1)(a) Except in a benefit enforcement proceeding,
no person may bring an action or assert a claim against a benefit corporation
or its directors or officers with respect to:

(i) Failure to pursue or
create general public benefit or a specific public benefit set forth in its
articles of incorporation; or

(ii)
Violation of an obligation, duty, or standard of conduct under the Nebraska
Benefit Corporation Act.

(b)
A benefit corporation is not liable for monetary damages under the act for
any failure of the benefit corporation to pursue or create general public
benefit or a specific public benefit.

(2) A benefit enforcement proceeding may be commenced
or maintained only:

(a)
Directly by the benefit corporation; or

(b) Derivatively in accordance with the Business Corporation
Act by:

(i)
A person or group of persons that owned beneficially or of record at least
two percent of the total number of shares of a class or series outstanding
at the time of the act or omission complained of;

(ii) A director;

(iii) A person or group of
persons that owned beneficially or of record five percent or more of the outstanding
equity interests in an entity of which the benefit corporation is a subsidiary
at the time of the act or omission complained of; or

(iv) Other persons as specified in the
articles of incorporation or bylaws of the benefit corporation.

(3) For purposes of this
section, a person is the beneficial owner of shares or equity interests if
the shares or equity interests are held in a voting trust or by a nominee
on behalf of the beneficial owner.

Laws 2014, LB751, § 12.
July 18, 2014